Hawaii statutes.
§440-18 Inspectors; duties. The
commission shall appoint official representatives designated as inspectors,
each of whom shall receive from the commission a card or badge authorizing the
person to act as inspector whenever the commission may designate the person to
so act. An inspector or the executive officer shall be present at all
professional boxing contests and see that this chapter and the rules are
strictly observed and, as soon as practicable thereafter, shall mail or deliver
to the commission the official box office statement received by the inspector
or executive officer. [L 1929, c 216, §21; RL 1935, §7008; RL 1945, §7569; RL
1955, §165-20; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §15; am L 1963, c 114, §3; HRS §440-18; am
L 1983, c 241, §15; am L 2004, c 135, §16]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next